Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 9 Workers' Compensation
11-9-409. Safety and health loss control consultative services.

Workers' Health and Safety Division.

The Workers' Compensation Commission shall establish a Workers' Health and Safety Division, hereinafter referred to as the “division”.

The division shall collect and serve as a repository for statistical information on workers' health and safety. In cooperation with and with the assistance of the Department of Labor and Licensing and the State Insurance Department, the division shall analyze and use the information to identify and assign priorities to safety needs and to better coordinate the safety services provided by public or private organizations, including insurance carriers. In cooperation with and with the assistance of the Department of Labor and Licensing and the State Insurance Department, the division shall promote workers' health and safety through educational programs and other innovative programs developed by the division.

In cooperation with and with the assistance of the Department of Labor and Licensing and the State Insurance Department, the division shall coordinate or supervise the collection of information relating to job safety.

The Chair of the Workers' Compensation Commission, the Secretary of the Department of Labor and Licensing, and the Insurance Commissioner shall function as an advisory committee to resolve questions regarding duplication of efforts, assignment of new programs, and other matters that need cooperation and coordination.

In cooperation with and with the assistance of the Department of Labor and Licensing and the State Insurance Department, the division shall publish or procure and issue educational books, pamphlets, brochures, films, videotapes, and other informational and educational material. Specific educational material shall be directed to high-risk industries and jobs and shall specifically address means and methods of avoiding high frequency but preventable workers' injuries. Other educational material shall be directed to business and industry generally and shall specifically address means and methods of avoiding common workers' injuries.

Specific decisions as to what issues and problems should be addressed by such information shall be made by the division in cooperation and with the assistance of the Department of Labor and Licensing and the State Insurance Department and with commission approval after assigning appropriate priorities based on frequency of injuries, degree of hazard, severity of injuries, and similar considerations.

Such educational materials shall include specific references to the requirements of state laws and rules and federal laws and regulations, to recommendations and practices of business, industry, and trade associations, and, where needed, to recommended work practices based on recommendations made by the division, in cooperation and with the assistance of the Department of Labor and Licensing and the State Insurance Department, for the prevention of injury.

In cooperation with and with the assistance of the Department of Labor and Licensing and the State Insurance Department, the division shall cooperate with employers and employees to develop means and methods of educating employees and employers with regard to workplace safety.

In cooperation with and with the assistance of the Department of Labor and Licensing and the State Insurance Department, the division shall encourage other entities to develop safety courses, safety plans, and safety programs.

In cooperation with and with the assistance of the Department of Labor and Licensing and the State Insurance Department, the division shall certify safe employers to provide peer review safety programs.

In cooperation with and with the assistance of the Department of Labor and Licensing and the State Insurance Department, the division shall advise insurance carrier loss control service organizations of hazard classifications, specific employers, industries, occupations, or geographic regions to which loss control services should be directed or of the identity and types of injuries or occupational diseases for prevention of the same to which loss control services should be directed and shall advise insurance carrier loss control service organizations of safety needs and priorities recommended by the division in cooperation with and with the assistance of the Department of Labor and Licensing and the State Insurance Department.

Job Safety Information System.

In cooperation with and with the assistance of the Department of Labor and Licensing and the State Insurance Department, the division shall establish and maintain a job safety information system.

The job safety information system shall include a comprehensive database that incorporates all pertinent information relating to each reported injury.

The identity of the employee is confidential and may not be disclosed as part of the job safety information system.

Employers shall file with the commission such reports as may be necessary. The commission shall promulgate rules and prescribe the form and manner of the reports.

In cooperation with and with the assistance of the Department of Labor and Licensing and the State Insurance Department, the division is authorized, empowered, and directed to obtain, from any state agency, data and statistics, including those compiled for the purpose of ratemaking.

The division shall consult the Department of Labor and Licensing and any other affected state agencies in the design of data information and retrieval systems that will accomplish the mutual purposes of those agencies and of the division.

Extra-Hazardous Employer Program.

In cooperation with and with the assistance of the Department of Labor and Licensing and the State Insurance Department, the division shall develop a program, including injury frequency, to identify extra-hazardous employers. The term “extra-hazardous employer” includes an employer whose injury frequencies substantially exceed those that may reasonably be expected in that employer's business or industry, an employer whose experience modifier is identified by the commission as too high, and such other employers as may, following a public hearing, be identified as extra-hazardous.

The division shall notify each identified extra-hazardous employer or the carrier for the employer that the employer has been identified as an extra-hazardous employer.

An employer who receives notification under subdivision (c)(1)(B) of this section must obtain a safety consultation within thirty (30) days from the Department of Labor and Licensing, the employer's insurance carrier, or another professional source approved by the division for that purpose.

The safety consultant shall file a written report with the division and the employer setting out any hazardous conditions or practices identified by the safety consultation.

The employer and the consultant shall formulate a specific accident prevention plan that addresses the hazards identified by the consultant. The employer shall comply with the accident prevention plan.

The division may investigate accidents occurring at the work sites of an employer for whom a plan has been formulated under subdivision (c)(3) of this section, and the division may otherwise monitor the implementation of the accident prevention plan as it finds necessary.

Six (6) months after the formulation of an accident prevention plan prescribed by subdivision (c)(3) of this section, the division shall conduct a follow-up inspection of the employer's premises. The division may require the participation of the safety consultant who performed the initial consultation and formulated the safety plan.

If the division determines that the employer has complied with the terms of the accident prevention plan or has implemented other acceptable corrective measures, the division shall so certify.

An employer who the division determines has failed or refused to implement the accident prevention plan or other suitable hazard abatement measures is subject to civil penalties as follows:

The commission may assess a civil penalty against an employer who fails or refuses to implement the accident prevention plan or other suitable hazard abatement procedures in an amount up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day of violation payable to the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund; and

Furthermore, the commission may petition the Pulaski County Circuit Court, or of the county where the business is located, for an order enjoining the employer from engaging in further employment until such time as the employer implements the prevention plan or abatement measure described above or makes payment of all civil penalties.

If, at the time of the inspection required under subdivision (c)(5)(A) of this section, the employer continues to exceed the injury frequencies that may reasonably be expected in that employer's business or industry, the division shall continue to monitor the safety conditions at the work site and may formulate additional safety plans reasonably calculated to abate hazards. The employer shall comply with the plans and may be subject to additional penalties for failure to implement the plan or plans.

An employer may request a hearing before the full commission to contest findings made by the division under this section.

The identification as an extra-hazardous employer under this section is not admissible in any judicial proceeding unless the commission has determined that the employer is not in compliance with this section and unless that determination has not been reversed or superseded at the time of the event giving rise to the judicial proceeding.

Accident Prevention Services.

Any insurance company licensed to provide casualty insurance in the State of Arkansas and desiring to write workers' compensation insurance in Arkansas shall maintain or provide accident prevention services as a prerequisite to write workers' compensation insurance. The services shall be adequate to furnish accident prevention programs required by the nature of its policyholders' operations and shall include surveys, recommendations, training programs, consultations, analyses of accident causes, industrial hygiene, and industrial health services to implement the program of accident prevention services.

Notice that services are available to the policyholder from the insurance company must appear in no less than ten-point bold type on the front of each workers' compensation insurance policy delivered or issued for delivery in the state.

At least once each year, each insurance company writing workers' compensation insurance in Arkansas must submit to the division detailed information on the type of accident prevention services offered to that insurance company's policyholders. The information must include any additional information required by the commission.

In cooperation with and with the assistance of the Department of Labor and Licensing and the State Insurance Department, the division shall conduct inspections to determine the adequacy of the accident prevention services required by subdivision (d)(1) of this section at least every two (2) years for each insurance company writing workers' compensation insurance in Arkansas.

If the insurance company does not maintain or provide the accident prevention services required by this subsection or if the insurance company does not use the services in a reasonable manner to prevent injury to employees of its policyholders, the insurance company may be subjected to the same civil penalties as are assessable and enforceable against employers as set forth above in subdivision (c)(5)(C) of this section and shall be subject to suspension or revocation of license to do business in this state by the Insurance Commissioner.

The commission shall employ the qualified personnel necessary to enforce this section.

Immunity from Certain Liability.

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(5) of this section, the insurance company, the agent, servant, or employee of the insurance company or self-insured employer, or a safety consultant who performs a safety consultation under this section shall have no liability with respect to any accident based on the allegation that the accident was caused or could have been prevented by a program, inspection, or other activity or service undertaken by the insurance company or self-insured employer for the prevention of accidents in connection with operations of the employer.

Provided, however, this immunity shall not affect the liability of the insurance carrier or self-insured employer for compensation or as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Exclusive Remedy. This section does not create an independent cause of action at law or in equity.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 796, § 13; 2005, No. 505, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 787; 2019, No. 910, 5360-5365.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Acts 2010, No. 129, § 8, provided: “QUARTERLY REPORTS.

Due to the critical role of the Health and Safety and Medical Cost Containment Programs to the overall programs of the Workers' Compensation Commission (WCC), the WCC shall provide quarterly reports to the Arkansas Legislative Council and to the House and Senate Committees on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor on the progress of the Health and Safety Program and the Medical Cost Containment Program, in such detail as may be required by either body. These reports shall be posted on the agency's web page.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2010 through June 30, 2011.”

Publisher's Notes.

Former § 11-9-409, concerning risks rejected by insurance companies and assignment thereof by the commission, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 561, § 4. The section was derived from Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 9; Acts 1949, p. 1420; Acts 1975, No. 174, § 1; 1983, No. 769, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1309.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 inserted “laws and rules” in (a)(5)(C).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Department of Labor and Licensing” for “Department of Labor” throughout the section; and substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a)(4).

11-9-410. Third-party liability.

Liability Unaffected.

The making of a claim for compensation against any employer or carrier for the injury or death of an employee shall not affect the right of the employee, or his or her dependents, to make a claim or maintain an action in court against any third party for the injury, but the employer or the employer's carrier shall be entitled to reasonable notice and opportunity to join in the action.

If they, or either of them, join in the action, they shall be entitled to a first lien upon two-thirds (2/3) of the net proceeds recovered in the action that remain after the payment of the reasonable costs of collection, for the payment to them of the amount paid and to be paid by them as compensation to the injured employee or his or her dependents.

The commencement of an action by an employee or his or her dependents against a third party for damages by reason of an injury to which this chapter is applicable, or the adjustment of any claim, shall not affect the rights of the injured employee or his or her dependents to recover compensation, but any amount recovered by the injured employee or his or her dependents from a third party shall be applied as follows:

Reasonable costs of collection shall be deducted;

Then, in every case, one-third (1/3) of the remainder shall belong to the injured employee or his or her dependents, as the case may be;

The remainder, or so much as is necessary to discharge the actual amount of the liability of the employer and the carrier; and

Any excess shall belong to the injured employee or his or her dependents.

Subrogation.

An employer or carrier liable for compensation under this chapter for the injury or death of an employee shall have the right to maintain an action in tort against any third party responsible for the injury or death. However, the employer or the carrier must notify the claimant in writing that the claimant has the right to hire a private attorney to pursue any benefits to which the claimant is entitled in addition to the subrogation interest against any third party responsible for the injury or death.

After reasonable notice and opportunity to be represented in the action has been given to the compensation beneficiary, the liability of the third party to the compensation beneficiary shall be determined in the action, as well as the third party's liability to the employer and carrier.

After recovery shall be had against the third party, by suit or otherwise, the compensation beneficiary shall be entitled to any amount recovered over and above the amount that the employer and carrier have paid or are liable for in compensation, after deducting reasonable costs of collection.

In no event shall the compensation beneficiary be entitled to less than one-third (1/3) of the amount recovered from the third party, after deducting the reasonable cost of collection.

An employer or carrier who is liable for compensation under this chapter on account of injury or death of an employee shall be entitled to maintain a third party action against the employer's uninsured motorist coverage or underinsured motorist coverage.

The purpose and intent of this subsection is to prevent double payment to the employee.

Settlement of Claims.

Settlement of claims under subsections (a) and (b) of this section must have the approval of the court or of the Workers' Compensation Commission, except that the distribution of that portion of the settlement that represents the compensation payable under this chapter must have the approval of the commission.

Where liability is admitted to the injured employee or his or her dependents by the employer or carrier, the cost of collection may be deducted from that portion of the settlement under subsections (a) or (b) of this section representing compensation, upon direction and approval of the commission.

No party shall settle a claim under subsections (a) and (b) of this section without first giving three (3) days' written notice to all parties with an interest in the claim of the intent to settle.

Each party with an interest in a claim under subsections (a) and (b) shall cooperate with all other parties in litigation or settlement of such claims.

History.

Init. Meas. 1948, No. 4, § 40, Acts 1949, p. 1420; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1340; Acts 1993, No. 796, § 14.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As originally enacted by Acts 1993, No. 796, § 14, subsection (b)(4) contained an additional sentence which read:

“Any and all case law inconsistent herewith is specifically annulled”. and subsection (c) contained a subdivision (4) which read: “The purpose and intent of the reenactment of this statute is to annul any and all case law inconsistent herewith.”

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

Cross References.

Exclusivity of workers' compensation remedies, § 11-9-105.

11-9-411. Effect of payment by other insurers.

Any benefits payable to an injured worker under this chapter shall be reduced in an amount equal to, dollar-for-dollar, the amount of benefits the injured worker has previously received for the same medical services or period of disability, whether those benefits were paid under a group health care service plan of whatever form or nature, a group disability policy, a group loss of income policy, a group accident, health, or accident and health policy, a self-insured employee health or welfare benefit plan, or a group hospital or medical service contract.

The reduction specified in subdivision (a)(1) of this section does not apply to any benefit received from a group policy for disability if the injured worker has paid for the policy.

The claimant shall be required to disclose in a manner to be determined by the Workers' Compensation Commission the identity, address, or phone number of any person or entity which has paid benefits described in this section in connection with any claim under this chapter.

Prior to any final award or approval of a joint petition, the claimant shall be required to furnish the respondent with releases of all subrogation claims for the benefits described in this section.

In the event that the claimant is unable to produce releases required by this section, then the commission shall determine the amount of such potential subrogation claims and shall direct the carrier or self-insured employer to hold in reserve only said sums for a period of five (5) years.

If, after the expiration of five (5) years, no release or final court order is presented otherwise directing the payment of said sums, then the carrier or self-insured employer shall tender said sums to the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 796, § 32; 2009, No. 327, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 1757, § 9, provided in part:

“Nothing in the act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001, nor in Act 1552 of 1999 shall impliedly repeal any part of Act 796 of 1993. Act 796 of 1993 is expressly reaffirmed by this act, which originated as House Bill 2646 of 2001.”

11-9-412. Motor carrier drivers — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Commercial motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle or combination of motor vehicles used in commerce to transport passengers or property;

“Driver” means a person, including but not limited to a member of a team, who operates a commercial motor vehicle;

“Motor carrier” means a person, partnership, corporation, or limited liability company that provides truck transportation; and

“Owner-operator” means a person, partnership, corporation, or limited liability company that owns or holds under a bona fide lease a commercial motor vehicle that is provided to a motor carrier.

Notwithstanding any other law, an owner-operator that provides a commercial motor vehicle and the services of one (1) or more drivers to a motor carrier under a written contract, and each driver so provided, is not an employee of the motor carrier but is an independent contractor of the motor carrier.

The motor carrier shall not be liable for any compensation required by this chapter to the owner-operator, its employees, or subcontractors.

An owner-operator that is under exclusive contract to the motor carrier may elect to secure coverage for the owner-operator and for one (1) or more drivers of the owner-operator through a workers' compensation insurance policy or authorized self-insurance plan that insures the motor carrier if:

The election by the owner-operator is made in writing as part of a written contract between the owner-operator and the motor carrier; and

The owner-operator pays the premiums as requested by the motor carrier.

An owner-operator's election, whether or not under subdivision (b)(3) of this section, to be covered and to have one (1) or more of its drivers covered under a workers' compensation insurance policy or authorized self-insurance plan shall not terminate or otherwise affect the independent-contractor status of the owner-operator or of any of its drivers.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1166, § 1.

Subchapter 5
— Accidental Injury or Death

Publisher's Notes.

Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, referred to in Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 21, is cited as 290 Ark. 100, 717 S.W.2d 488 (1986).

Cross References.

Payment to dependents of covered public employees killed in the line of duty, § 21-5-701 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1961, No. 479, § 2: Mar. 16, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is declared by the General Assembly that inflation has rendered funeral expense benefits under the Workers' Compensation Act grossly insufficient to accomplish the purpose for which such benefits were originally intended; that there is urgent need to increase such benefits; and that enactment of this bill will provide the remedy. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from the date of its approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 221, § 3: Mar. 2, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the welfare of both employer and employee is of primary interest and concern to the State of Arkansas; that the maximum benefits presently payable under the Workers' Compensation law have become totally inadequate due to the steadily increasing cost of living, and that it is in the best interest of both employers and employees that this be accomplished as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 330, § 3: Mar. 7, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that immediate passage of this Act is necessary to permit employees to have full coverage of medical benefits in industrial accidents. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1227, § 21: Feb. 13, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the welfare of both employer and employee is of primary interest and concern to the State of Arkansas; that the maximum benefits presently payable under the Workmen's Compensation law are inadequate due to the steadily increasing cost of living and should be increased immediately to meet said increase in the cost of living; that certain other provisions should be clarified or modified, and that it is in the best interest of both employers and employees that this be accomplished as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 253, § 12: Mar. 2, 1979. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Workers' Compensation law are in urgent need of revision to more clearly define the benefits to be provided by Worker's Compensation coverage; that this Act is designed to provide such clarification and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1981, No. 290, § 17: Mar. 3, 1981. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that there is urgent need to clarify the provisions of the Arkansas Workers' Compensation law and to provide improved benefits for persons qualifying under that Act; that this Act is designed to provide such clarification and improved benefits and should be given effect at the earliest possible date. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1985, No. 842, § 3: April 4, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the present law allowing only $750 funeral expenses benefits under the Workers' Compensation Act is totally inadequate and should be increased immediately to provide more equitable protection to survivors of a person who dies from work-related injuries. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1986 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 10, § 15: July 1, 1986. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the increased benefits and improvements in the administration of the Workers' Compensation system in Arkansas is in the best interest of employees, employers, the public in general; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1986.”

Acts 1987, No. 1015, § 21: Apr. 14, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1227 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 796, § 41: July 1, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Workers' Compensation Law is in immediate need of substantial revision; that this act accomplishes immediate revision; and that this act shall go into effect as soon as is practical which is determined to be July 1, 1993; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect until after July 1, 1993. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1993. Furthermore, the provisions of this act shall apply only to injuries which occur after July 1, 1993.”

Acts 1997, No. 260, § 7: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that unless the General Assembly acts, the impairment rating guide adopted by the Workers' Compensation Commission will become null and void on March 1, 1997; that if the guide is permitted to expire, there will be no impairment guide in effect and injured workers may be deprived of just benefits; that the purpose and intent of this act is to approve the impairment guide adopted by the commission and the act should be given effect immediately to assure that there will be no lapse in the application of the impairment rating guide. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 975, § 20: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 1999, No. 1179, § 19: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1999 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1999 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.